Massachusetts, session 194th, H3106.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2 of chapter 64L of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the word “cent”, in line 4, the following words:- or 1.5 per
cent.
of 1